Idaho, session 2025, S1066.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 28-51-104, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
28-51-104. DEFINITIONS. For purposes of sections 28-51-104 through
28-51-107, Idaho Code:
(1) "Agency" means any "public agency" as defined in section 74-101,
Idaho Code.
(2) "Breach of the security of the system" means the illegal acquisi-
tion of unencrypted computerized data that materially compromises the se-
curity, confidentiality, or integrity of personal information for one (1)
or more persons maintained by an agency, individual or a commercial entity.
Good faith acquisition of personal information by an employee or agent of an
agency, individual or a commercial entity for the purposes of the agency, in-
dividual or the commercial entity is not a breach of the security of the sys-
tem, provided that the personal information is not used or subject to fur-
ther unauthorized disclosure. A breach of the security of the system of an
agency, individual, or commercial entity does not include the acquisition
of data from any source other than systems maintained by the agency, indi-
vidual, or commercial entity, or a service provider acting on behalf of such
agency, individual, or commercial entity.
(3) "Commercial entity" includes corporation, business trust, estate,
trust, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership,
limited liability company, association, organization, joint venture and any
other legal entity, whether for profit or not-for-profit not for profit.
(4) "Encryption" includes standard encryption, which scrambles data
and requires a digital key to unscramble such data, and any other technique
that translates or substitutes unusable data for personal information and
requires a token, key, or other protective process to convert the translated
or substituted data to personal information.
(4) (5) "Notice" means:
(a) Written notice to the most recent address the agency, individual or
commercial entity has in its records;


(b) Telephonic notice;
(c) Electronic notice, if the notice provided is consistent with the
provisions regarding electronic records and signatures set forth in 15
U.S.C. section 7001; or
(d) Substitute notice, if the agency, individual or the commercial
entity required to provide notice demonstrates that the cost of pro-
viding notice will exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or
that the number of Idaho residents to be notified exceeds fifty thousand
(50,000), or that the agency, individual or the commercial entity does
not have sufficient contact information to provide notice. Substitute
notice consists of all of the following:
(i) E-mail notice if the agency, individual or the commercial en-
tity has e-mail addresses for the affected Idaho residents; and
(ii) Conspicuous posting of the notice on the website page of the
agency, individual or the commercial entity if the agency, indi-
vidual or the commercial entity maintains one; and
(iii) Notice to major statewide media.
(5) (6) "Personal information" "Personally identifiable information"
or "(PII)" means an Idaho resident's first name or first initial and last
name in combination with any one (1) or more of the following data elements
that relate to the resident, when either the name or and the data elements are
not encrypted:
(a) Social security number;
(b) Driver's license number, passport number, or Idaho other govern-
ment-issued identification card number; or
(c) Account number, or credit or debit card number, in combination with
any required security code, access code, or password that would permit
access to a resident's financial account;
(d) Username or email address, in combination with a password or secu-
rity question that would permit access to an online account;
(e) Individual medical history, treatment, diagnosis, or DNA profile;
(f) Unique biometric data generated for authentication purposes; or
(g) Individual taxpayer identification number.
The term "personal personally identifiable information" does not in-
clude publicly available information that is lawfully made available to the
general public from federal, state, or local government records or widely
distributed media.
(6) (7) "Primary regulator" of a commercial entity or individual li-
censed or chartered by the United States is that commercial entity's or in-
dividual's primary federal regulator, the primary regulator of a commercial
entity or individual licensed by the department of finance is the department
of finance, the primary regulator of a commercial entity or individual li-
censed by the department of insurance is the department of insurance and, for
all agencies and all other commercial entities or individuals, the primary
regulator is the attorney general.
SECTION 2. That Section 28-51-105, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
28-51-105. DISCLOSURE OF BREACH OF SECURITY OF COMPUTERIZED PERSONAL
PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION BY AN AGENCY, INDIVIDUAL, OR A COMMER-


CIAL ENTITY. (1) A city, county, or state agency, an individual, or a com-
mercial entity that conducts business in Idaho and that owns or licenses com-
puterized data that includes personal information PII about a resident of
Idaho shall, when it becomes aware of a breach of the security of the system,
conduct in good faith a reasonable and prompt investigation to determine the
likelihood that personal information PII has been or will be misused. If the
investigation determines that the misuse of information about an Idaho res-
ident has occurred or is reasonably likely to occur, the agency, individ-
ual, or the commercial entity shall give notice as soon as possible to the af-
fected Idaho resident. Notice must be made in the most expedient time possi-
ble and without unreasonable delay, consistent with the legitimate needs of
law enforcement and consistent with any measures necessary to determine the
scope of the breach, to identify the individuals affected, and to restore the
reasonable integrity of the computerized data system.
When an agency becomes aware of a breach of the security of the system,
it shall, within twenty-four (24) hours of such discovery, notify the office
of the Idaho attorney general. Nothing contained in this section relieves
a state agency's responsibility to report a security breach to the office of
the chief information officer within the department of administration, pur-
suant to the Idaho technology authority policies.
Any governmental employee who intentionally discloses personal infor-
mation PII not subject to disclosure otherwise allowed by law is guilty of
a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of
not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by imprisonment in the county
jail for a period of not more than one (1) year, or both.
(2) An agency, individual, or a commercial entity that maintains com-
puterized data that includes personal information PII that the agency, in-
dividual, or the commercial entity does not own or license shall give notice
to and cooperate with the owner or licensee of the information of any breach
of the security of the system immediately following discovery of a breach if
misuse of personal information about an Idaho resident occurred or is rea-
sonably likely to occur. Cooperation includes sharing with the owner or li-
censee information relevant to the breach.
(3) Notice required by this section may be delayed if a law enforcement
agency advises the agency, individual, or commercial entity that the notice
will impede a criminal investigation. Notice required by this section must
be made in good faith, without unreasonable delay and as soon as possible af-
ter the law enforcement agency advises the agency, individual, or commercial
entity that notification will no longer impede the investigation.
(4) An agency, individual, or commercial entity that has determined
that the misuse of PII about an Idaho resident has occurred or is reasonably
likely to occur shall, in addition to the notice required by this section:
(a) Offer to provide credit monitoring services at no cost to the af-
fected resident for a period of not less than twelve (12) months; and
(b) Provide information on how to enroll in the free credit monitor-
ing service pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection and how the af-
fected resident can place a credit freeze on such resident's credit file
with credit reporting agencies.
SECTION 3. That Section 28-51-106, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:


28-51-106. PROCEDURES DEEMED IN COMPLIANCE WITH SECURITY BREACH
REQUIREMENTS. (1) An agency, an individual, or a commercial entity that
maintains its own notice procedures as part of an information security pol-
icy for the treatment of personal personally identifiable information, and
whose procedures are otherwise consistent with the timing requirements of
section 28-51-105, Idaho Code, is deemed to be in compliance with the notice
requirements of section 28-51-105, Idaho Code, if the agency, individual, or
the commercial entity notifies affected Idaho residents in accordance with
its policies in the event of a breach of security of the system.
(2) An individual or a commercial entity that is regulated by state or
federal law and that maintains procedures for a breach of the security of
the system pursuant to the laws, rules, regulations, guidances, or guide-
lines established by its primary or functional state or federal regulator is
deemed to be in compliance with section 28-51-105, Idaho Code, if the indi-
vidual or the commercial entity complies with the maintained procedures when
a breach of the security of the system occurs.
SECTION 4. That Section 28-51-107, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
28-51-107. VIOLATIONS. In any case in which an agency's, commercial
entity's or individual's primary regulator has reason to believe that an
agency, individual or commercial entity subject to that primary regula-
tor's jurisdiction under section 28-51-104(6) (7), Idaho Code, has violated
section 28-51-105, Idaho Code, by failing to give notice in accordance
with that section, the primary regulator may bring a civil action to en-
force compliance with that section and enjoin that agency, individual or
commercial entity from further violations. Any agency, individual or com-
mercial entity that intentionally fails to give notice in accordance with
section 28-51-105, Idaho Code, shall be subject to a fine of not more than
twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per breach of the security of the
system.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.